Utah statutes.
58-9-506.   Inspection -- Right to access.

A licensed funeral service establishment is subject to inspection during normal business hours to determine compliance with the laws of Utah by:

(1)  any authorized representative of the division; or

(2)  any authorized representative of a local or state health department.

